Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.440

Election account.

(1) The election account is created in the state treasury.

(2) The following receipts must be deposited into the account:

Amounts received from the federal government under Public Law 107-252 (October 29, 2002), known as the "Help America Vote Act of 2002," including any amounts received under subsequent amendments to the act;

amounts appropriated or otherwise made available by the state legislature for the purposes of carrying out activities for which federal funds are provided to the state under Public Law 107-252, including any amounts received under subsequent amendments to the act;

and such other amounts as may be appropriated by the legislature to the account.

(3) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be made only to facilitate the implementation of Public Law 107-252.

[ 2004 c 266 s 2. Prior: 2003 c 48 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.04.260.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 266: See note following RCW 29A.04.575.

Effective date—2003 c 48: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 17, 2003]." [ 2003 c 48 s 3.]